hu: Festékközeg típusa: Akril; Beégetett; Máz; Gouache; Olaj; Kiöntő; Késleltető; Texturáló; Lakk; Vízfesték; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип среда за боядисване: Акрил; Енкаустика; Остъкляване; Гваш; Масло; Заливане; Забавител; Текстура; Лак; Акварел; Други
ko: 페인트 매제 유형: 아크릴; 엔코스틱; 글레이징; 과슈; 오일; 푸어링; 리타더; 질감(식감); 니스; 수채화; 기타
th: ประเภทตัวผสมสี: อะคริลิก; การเขียนสีขี้ผึ้งร้อน; การเคลือบ; สีกวอช; น้ำมัน; การเทหรือสาด; สารหน่วงปฏิกิริยา; พื้นผิว; น้ำยาวานิช; สีน้ำ; อื่นๆ
sv: Typ av målningsmedium: Akryl; Enkaustisk; Inglasning; Gouache; Olja; Hällning; Retarderingsmedel; Textur; Lack; Vattenfärg; Övrigt
ru: Тип медиума для краски: Акрил; Энкаустика; Глазурь; Гуашь; Масло; Заливка; Замедлитель; Текстура; Лак; Акварель; Другое
da: Malemedietype: Akryl; Enkaustisk; Glasering; Gouache; Olie; Hældning; Retarder; Struktur; Lak; Akvarel; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta slikarskog medija: Akril; Enkaustični; Ostakljenje; Gvaš; Ulje; Izlijevanje; Usporivač; Tekstura; Lak; Akvarel; Ostalo
zh-CN: 涂料介质类型: 丙烯酸; 蜡画; 上釉; 水粉画; 润滑油; 浇注; 缓凝剂; 质地; 漆; 水彩; 其他
nb: Middels malingstype: Akryl; Enkaustisk; Glasering; Gouache; Olje; Helling; Retarder; Tekstur; Lakk; Akvarell; Annet
en: Paint medium type: Acrylic; Encaustic; Glazing; Gouache; Oil; Pouring; Retarder; Texture; Varnish; Watercolor; Other
fr: Type de support de peinture: Acrylique; Encaustique; Glacis; Gouache; Huile; Coulante; Retardateur; Texture; Vernis; Aquarelle; Autre
ja: 油絵具メディウムの種類: アクリル; エンコースティック; グレージング; ガッシュ; オイル; ポーリング; リターダー; 質感; ワニス; 水彩; その他
lt-LT: Dažų skiediklio tipas: Akriliniai; Enkaustiniai; Glazūra; Guašas; Aliejiniai; Pilami; Lėtiklis; Tekstūruoti; Lakas; Akvarelė; Kita
tr: Resim ortamı türü: Akrilik; Yakımlı; Glaze; Guaj boya; Yağ; Dökme; Retarder; Doku; Vernik; Suluboya; Diğer
cs: Typ nátěrového média: Akrylové; Enkaustika; Glazing; Kvaš; Olej; Nalévání; Retardér; Textura; Lak; Akvarelové barvy; Jiné
fi: Maalivälinetyyppi: Akryyli; Vahamaalaus; Lasitus; Guassi; Öljyt; Kaato; Hidastin; Tekstuuri; Lakat; Akvarelliväri; Muu
pl: Typ medium malarskiego: Akryl; Enkaustyczny; Przeszklenie; Gwasz; Ropa naftowa; Zsyp; Opóźniacz; Tekstura; Lakier; Akwarela; Inne
nl: Type schilderhulpmiddel: Acryl; Wasschilderen; Beglazing; Gouache; Olie; Gieten; Vertrager; Textuur; Vernis; Aquarelinkt; Andere
it: Tipo di medium per pittura: Acrilico; Encaustica; Velatura; Guazzo; Olio; Colata; Ritardante; Tramato; Vernice; Acquerello; Altro
ro-RO: Tip mediu pentru pictură: Acrilică; Cerneală penetrantă; Glazură; Guașă; Ulei; Turnare; Inhibitor; Textură; Lac; Acuarelă; Altele
vi: Loại dung môi sơn: Acrylic; Vẽ khắc nung; Đánh bóng; Bột màu; Dầu; Đổ màu; Chất làm chậm; Có vân; Véc-ni; Màu nước; Khác
es: Tipo de medios de pintura: Acrílico; Encáustico; Barnizado; Témpera; Aceite; Vertido; Retardador; Textura; Barniz; Acuarela; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo do agente de pintura: Acrílico; Encáustica; Esmaltado; Guache; Óleo; Derramado; Retardador; Textura; Verniz; Tinta de aquarela; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta barvnega medija: Akril; Enkavstična; Zasteklitev; Gvaš; Olje; Nalivanje; Upočasnjevalec sušenja barve; Tekstura; Lak; Akvarel; Drugo
de: Art des Farbmediums: Acryl; Enkaustik; Glasierung; Gouache; Öl; Pouring; Retarder; Textur; Lack; Aquarellfarbe; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de produto de pintura: Acrílico; Encáustica; Vitrificação; Guache; Óleo; Derrame; Retarder; Textura; Verniz; Aguarela; Outro
el: Τύπος μέσου χρώματος: Ακρυλικό; Εγκαυστική; Επισμάλτωση; Γκουάς; Έλαιο; Ρίψη; Επιβραδυντικό; Υφή; Βερνίκι; Υδροχρωμάτων; Άλλο
zh-TW: 塗料介質類型: 壓克力; 蠟; 玻璃; 水粉畫; 油; 澆注; 緩乾劑; 質地; 亮光漆; 水彩; 其他
sk-SK: Typ média farby: Akryl; Enkaustika; Glazúrovanie; Gvaš; Olej; Nalievanie; Retardér; Textúra; Lak; Akvarel; Iné